Nevada, session 83, AB509.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1-17. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 17.5. Chapter 709 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A broadband provider engaged in the business of
providing, for compensation, broadband service or broadband
infrastructure access may not access the public right-of-way
managed by a local government unless the broadband provider
has entered into an agreement with the local government
responsible for managing the right-of-way pursuant to this
section.
2. A local government shall execute and perform agreements
with broadband providers pursuant to subsection 1 in a
nondiscriminatory manner.
3. An agreement entered into pursuant to subsection 1 must
provide for compensation to be paid by the broadband provider to
the local government that manages the public right-of-way to
which the broadband provider is seeking access. Such
compensation:
(a) Must not exceed 2 percent of the annual gross revenue
derived from providing broadband service, broadband
infrastructure access or both broadband service and broadband
infrastructure access within the jurisdiction of the local
government that manages the right-of-way; and
(b) May take the form of a franchise fee, license fee or such
other compensation as the local government may require.
4. The requirements of subsection 1 apply to any broadband
provider attempting to access the public right-of-way maintained
by a local government, regardless of whether the broadband
provider has been issued a certificate of public convenience and
necessity by the Public Utilities Commission of Nevada pursuant
to chapter 704 of NRS.
5. The provisions of this section shall not be construed as
prohibiting any person or entity from providing an interstate or
intrastate telecommunications service for the purposes of 47
U.S.C. § 253.
6. As used in this section:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(a) “Broadband infrastructure access” means the provision of
open access network or other wholesale signal transmission
service for the provision of broadband service.
(b) “Broadband provider” means any person that:
(1) Provides or offers to provide broadband service,
broadband infrastructure access or both broadband service and
broadband infrastructure access;
(2) Does not hold a certificate of authority to act as a video
service provider or to construct or operate a video service network
pursuant to chapter 711 of NRS;
(3) Is not a provider of basic network service, as that term is
defined in NRS 704.006; and
(4) Is not licensed by the Public Utilities Commission of
Nevada as a provider of commercial mobile radio service pursuant
to NRS 704.033.
(c) “Broadband service” means a service that, by wire, radio or
any other technology, provides a person with the capability to
transmit data to and receive data from all or substantially all
Internet endpoints at a rate that is generally not less than 20
megabits per second in at least one direction.
(d) “Local government” means any city or county and
includes, without limitation:
(1) Any entity or agency that is directly or indirectly
controlled by any city or county; and
(2) Any entity or agency that is created by joint action or
any interlocal or cooperative agreement of two or more cities or
counties, or any combination thereof.
Sec. 18. NRS 354.5989 is hereby amended to read as follows:
354.5989 1. A local government shall not increase any fee
for a business license or adopt a fee for a business license issued for
revenue or regulation, or both, except as permitted by this section.
This prohibition does not apply to fees:
(a) Imposed by hospitals, county airports, airport authorities,
convention authorities, the Las Vegas Valley Water District or the
Clark County Sanitation District;
(b) Imposed on public utilities for the privilege of doing
business pursuant to a franchise;
(c) Imposed on broadband providers in accordance with an
agreement entered into pursuant to section 17.5 of this act;
(d) Imposed in compliance with the provisions of NRS 711.670
on video service providers for the privilege of doing business
pursuant to chapter 711 of NRS;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
[(d)] (e) For business licenses which are calculated as a fraction
or percentage of the gross revenue of the business;
[(e)] (f) Imposed pursuant to NRS 244.348, 268.0973, 268.821
or 269.182; or
[(f)] (g) Regulated pursuant to NRS 354.59881 to 354.59889,
inclusive.
2. The amount of revenue the local government derives or is
allowed to derive, whichever is greater, from all fees for business
licenses except:
(a) The fees excluded by subsection 1, for the fiscal year ended
on June 30, 1991; and
(b) The fees collected for a particular type of business during the
immediately preceding fiscal year ending on June 30 that a local
government will not collect in the next subsequent fiscal year,
 is the base from which the maximum allowable revenue from
such fees must be calculated for the next subsequent fiscal year. To
the base must be added the sum of the amounts respectively equal to
the product of the base multiplied by the percentage increase in the
population of the local government added to the percentage increase
in the Consumer Price Index for the year ending on December 31
next preceding the year for which the limit is being calculated. The
amount so determined becomes the base for computing the allowed
increase for each subsequent year.
3. A local government may not increase any fee for a business
license which is calculated as a fraction or percentage of the gross
revenue of the business if its total revenues from such fees have
increased during the preceding fiscal year by more than the increase
in the Consumer Price Index during that preceding calendar year.
The provisions of this subsection do not apply to a fee:
(a) Imposed in compliance with the provisions of NRS 711.670
on video service providers for the privilege of doing business
pursuant to chapter 711 of NRS;
(b) Imposed pursuant to NRS 244.348, 268.0973, 268.821 or
269.182; or
(c) Regulated pursuant to NRS 354.59881 to 354.59889,
inclusive.
4. A local government may submit an application to increase
its revenue from fees for business licenses beyond the amount
allowable pursuant to this section to the Nevada Tax Commission,
which may grant the application only if it finds that the rate of a
business license of the local government is substantially below that
of other local governments in the State.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
5. The provisions of this section apply to a business license
regardless of the fund to which the revenue from it is assigned. An
ordinance or resolution enacted by a local government in violation
of the provisions of this section is void.
6. As used in this section, “fee for a business license” does not
include a tax imposed on the revenues from the rental of transient
lodging.
Sec. 19. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 19.5. 1. Upon passage and approval of this act, a local
government may negotiate and enter into agreements with
broadband providers pursuant to section 17.5 of this act.
2. A local government shall not, before July 1, 2026, suspend,
revoke or deny the access of a broadband provider to the public
right-of-way managed by the local government on the basis that the
broadband provider has not executed an agreement with the local
government pursuant to section 17.5 of this act.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Broadband provider” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 17.5 of this act.
(b) “Local government” has the meaning ascribed to it in section
17.5 of this act.
Sec. 20. 1. This section and section 19.5 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 19, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)